New Jersey, session 221, A585.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Board of Public Utilities shall conduct a study for the purpose of identifying, researching, and quantifying the effects of short-term solutions that could open segments of the electrical transmission and distribution system that are currently closed to new distributed energy generation sources. b.    The board shall consider the following potential solutions, as well as any additional potential solutions identified by the board: (1) permitting the flow of electricity, through an electrical substation, from the distribution system to the transmission system; (2) requiring solar inverters to include technology that allows the inverter to autonomously control the reactive power passing through the inverter; (3) requiring energy storage systems to include technology that allows the power input and output of the system to vary in relation to the demand for electric power in the transmission and distribution system at a given time; and (4) requiring solar photovoltaic systems to include technology that enables the power output of the system to autonomously respond to weather conditions. c.     No later than one year after the effective date of this act, the board shall prepare and submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a report containing the findings and recommendations of the board, including any recommendations for legislative, regulatory, or local governmental action to open up additional segments of the transmission and distribution system to new distributed energy generation sources. d.    As used in this section: "Board" means the Board of Public Utilities. "Reactive power" means the portion of alternating current electricity, measured in volt-amperes reactive, that cannot do useful work due to a misalignment of the current and voltage waveforms of the electricity. "Transmission and distribution system" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). 2.    No later than one year after the board transmits the report required pursuant to subsection c. of section 1 of this act, the board shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations that implement the report's recommendations for regulatory action.  The rules and regulations shall initially implement the recommendations as a pilot program in a small region or regions of the State, and then, if the pilot program is determined by the board to be successful, the board shall provide for Statewide implementation of the rules and regulations. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.